Illinois, session 104th, SB1400.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Civil Procedure is amended by 5changing Section 13-102 as follows: 6    (735 ILCS 5/13-102)  (from Ch. 110, par. 13-102)7    Sec. 13-102. Breach of condition subsequent. No person 8shall commence an action for the recovery of lands, nor make an 9entry thereon, by reason of the breach of a condition 10subsequent, unless within 7 years after the time that 11condition is first broken. Continuing, successive or recurring 12breaches shall not extend the time for commencing the action 13or making the entry. Possession shall be deemed to be adverse 14and hostile from and after the first breach of a condition 15subsequent, notwithstanding the occurrence of successive or 16recurrent breaches. Possession is not adverse and hostile for 17any time during a 7-year period the person was in possession of 18lands in violation of Section 21 of the Landlord and Tenant 19Act.20(Source: P.A. 82-280.) 21    Section 10. The Landlord and Tenant Act is amended by 22adding Section 21 as follows:   SB1400- 2 -LRB104 08853 JRC 18908 b1    (765 ILCS 705/21 new)2    Sec. 21. Illegal possession of property. No person shall 3have a right or legal standing to occupy or remain on or in any 4real property, residence, or structure if the person has no 5written property interest under a written lease or rental 6agreement with the owner of the property listed in county tax 7records or the owner's agent; has no documentation of payment 8of rent made to the owner of the property or the owner's agent; 9or otherwise fails to provide any evidence of an oral or 10written agreement in which a property interest is claimed. All 11persons legally occupying a property, residence, or structure 12shall be listed by name and date of birth on a lease, rental 13agreement, or rental application associated with the lease or 14rental agreement or provide evidence that the person is an 15invitee of a lessee or authorized occupant of the property. No 16subleasing shall be allowed or deemed as legal in contrast to a 17lease or rental agreement that specifically prohibits 18subleases. A sublease made in violation of a lease or rental 19agreement shall not establish legal standing to occupy or 20remain on or in any real property, residence, or structure by 21the sublessee and the sublessee shall vacate the property 22after receiving notice from the property owner of record, or 23the property owner's designee, to depart. If a person 24occupying a property as an invitee of a lessee or an authorized 25occupant of the property, the property owner shall comply with   SB1400- 3 -LRB104 08853 JRC 18908 b1the notification requirements of subsection (g) of Section 29-106.2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.